Washington statutes.
RCW 43.89.050

Transfer of powers, duties and functions not to terminate or affect state liability.

The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions relating to the state teletypewriter communication network from the director of budget to the chief of the Washington state patrol shall not terminate or affect the liability of the state accruing with respect to such communications network to any person, company, or corporation.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 60 s 5.]